North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 15A. Counting Ballots, Canvassing Votes, Hearing Protests, and Certifying Results.
§ 163-182.10.
Consideration of protest by county board of elections.

Preliminary Consideration. — The following principles shall apply to the initial consideration of election protests by the county board of elections:

The county board shall, as soon as possible after the protest is filed, meet to determine whether the protest substantially complies with

G.S. 163-182.9

and whether it establishes probable cause to believe that a violation of election law or irregularity or misconduct has occurred. If the board determines that one or both requirements are not met, the board
shall dismiss the protest. The board shall notify both the protester and the State Board of Elections. The protester may file an amended protest or may appeal to the State Board. If the board determines that both requirements
are met, it shall schedule a hearing.

If a protest was filed before the canvass and concerns the counting and tabulating of votes, the county board shall resolve the protest before the canvass is completed. If necessary to provide time to resolve the protest, the county board may recess the
canvass meeting, but shall not delay the completion of the canvass for more than three days unless approved by the State Board of Elections. Resolution of the protest shall not delay the canvass of ballot items unaffected
by the protest. The appeal of a dismissal shall not delay the canvass.

If a protest concerns an irregularity other than the counting or tabulating of votes, that protest shall not delay the canvass.

Notice of Hearing. — The county board shall give notice of the protest hearing to the protester, any candidate likely to be affected, any election official alleged to have acted improperly, and those persons likely to have a significant interest in the
resolution of the protest. Each person given notice shall also be given a copy of the protest or a summary of its allegations. The manner of notice shall be as follows:

If the protest concerns the manner in which the votes were counted or the results tabulated, the protester shall be told at the time of filing that the protest will be heard at the time of the canvass. Others shall be notified as far in advance of the
canvass as time permits.

If the protest concerns a matter other than the manner in which votes were counted or results tabulated, the county board shall comply with rules to be promulgated by the State Board of Elections concerning reasonable notice of the hearing.Failure to
comply with the notice requirements in this subsection shall not delay the holding of a hearing nor invalidate the results if it appears reasonably likely that all interested persons were aware of the hearing and had an
opportunity to be heard.

Conduct of Hearing. — The following principles shall apply to the conduct of a protest hearing before the county board of elections:

The county board may allow evidence to be presented at the hearing in the form of affidavits or it may examine witnesses. The chair or any two members of the board may subpoena witnesses or documents. Each witness must be placed under oath before testifying.

The county board may receive evidence at the hearing from any person with information concerning the subject of the protest. The person who made the protest shall be permitted to present allegations and introduce evidence at the hearing. Any other person
to whom notice of hearing was given, if present, shall be permitted to present evidence. The board may allow evidence by affidavit. The board may permit evidence to be presented by a person to whom notice was not given,
if the person apparently has a significant interest in the resolution of the protest that is not adequately represented by other participants.

The hearing shall be recorded by a reporter or by mechanical means, and the full record of the hearing shall be preserved by the county board until directed otherwise by the State Board.

Findings of Fact and Conclusions of Law by County Board. — The county board shall make a written decision on each protest which shall state separately each of the following:

Findings of fact. — The findings of fact shall be based exclusively on the evidence and on matters officially noticed. Findings of fact, if set forth in statutory language, shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts
supporting them.

Conclusions of law. — The conclusions the county board may state, and their consequences for the board’s order, are as follows:

“The protest should be dismissed because it does not substantially comply with

G.S. 163-182.9

.” If the board makes this conclusion, it shall order the protest dismissed.

“The protest should be dismissed because there is not substantial evidence of a violation of the election law or other irregularity or misconduct.” If the county board makes this conclusion, it shall order the protest dismissed.

“The protest should be dismissed because there is not substantial evidence of any violation, irregularity, or misconduct sufficient to cast doubt on the results of the election.” If the county board makes this conclusion, it shall order the protest dismissed.

“There is substantial evidence to believe that a violation of the election law or other irregularity or misconduct did occur, and might have affected the outcome of the election, but the board is unable to finally determine the effect because the election
was a multicounty election.” If the county board makes this conclusion, it shall order that the protest and the county board’s decision be sent to the State Board for action by it.

“There is substantial evidence to believe that a violation of the election law or other irregularity or misconduct did occur and that it was sufficiently serious to cast doubt on the apparent results of the election.” If the county board makes this conclusion,
it may order any of the following as appropriate:

That the vote total as stated in the precinct return or result of the canvass be corrected and new results declared.

That votes be recounted.

That the protest and the county board’s decision be sent to the State Board for action by it.

Any other action within the authority of the county board.

An order. — Depending on the conclusion reached by the county board, its order shall be as directed in subdivision (c)(2). If the county board is not able to determine what law is applicable to the Findings of Fact, it may send its findings of fact to
the State Board for it to determine the applicable law.

Rules by State Board of Elections. — The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules providing for adequate notice to parties, scheduling of hearings, and the timing of deliberations and issuance of decision.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.11.
Appeal of a protest decision by the county board to the State Board of Elections.

Notice and Perfection of Appeal. — The decision by the county board of elections on an election protest may be appealed to the State Board of Elections by any of the following:

The person who filed the protest.

A candidate or elected official adversely affected by the county board’s decision.

Any other person who participated in the hearing and has a significant interest adversely affected by the county board’s decision.Written notice of the appeal must be given to the county board within 24 hours after the county board files the written decision
at its office. The appeal to the State Board must be in writing. The appeal must be delivered or deposited in the mail, addressed to the State Board, by the appropriate one of the following: (i) the end of the second day
after the day the decision was filed by the county board in its office, if the decision concerns a first primary; or (ii) the end of the fifth day after the day the decision was filed in the county board office, if the
decision concerns an election other than a first primary.The State Board shall prescribe forms for filing appeals from the county board.

Consideration of Appeal by State Board. — In its consideration of an appeal from a decision of a county board of elections on a protest, the State Board of Elections may do any of the following:

Decide the appeal on the basis of the record from the county board, as long as the county board has made part of the record a transcript of the evidentiary hearing.

Request the county board or any interested person to supplement the record from the county board, and then decide the appeal on the basis of that supplemented record.

Receive additional evidence and then decide the appeal on the basis of the record and that additional evidence.

Hold its own hearing on the protest and resolve the protest on the basis of that hearing.

Remand the matter to the county board for further proceedings in compliance with an order of the State Board.The State Board shall follow the procedures set forth in subsections (c) and (d) of

G.S. 163-182.10

except where they are clearly inapplicable.The State Board shall give notice of its decision as required by

G.S. 163-182.14

, and may notify the county board and other interested persons in its discretion.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.12.
Authority of State Board of Elections over protests.

The State Board of Elections may consider protests that were not filed in compliance with

G.S. 163-182.9

, may initiate and consider complaints on its own motion, may intervene and take jurisdiction over protests pending before a county board, and may take any other action necessary to assure that an election is determined
without taint of fraud or corruption and without irregularities that may have changed the result of an election. Where a known group of voters cast votes that were lost beyond retrieval or where a known group of voters was given an
incorrect ballot style, the State Board of Elections may authorize a county board of elections to allow those voters to recast their votes during a period of two weeks after the canvass by the State Board of Elections required in G.S.
163-182.5(c). If there is no State Board canvass after the election, the State Board may authorize the county board to allow the recasting of votes during the two weeks after the county canvass set in G.S. 163-182.5(a). If the State
Board approves a recasting of votes under this section, any procedures the county board uses to contact those voters and allow them to recast their votes shall be subject to approval by the State Board. Those recast votes shall be
added to the returns and included in the canvass. The recasting of those votes shall not be deemed a new election for purposes of

G.S. 163-182.13

.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2005-428, s. 17; 2007-391, s. 12; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.12A.
Post-election audits.

After conducting a post-election audit, the State Board shall produce a report which summarizes the audit, including the rationale for and the findings of the audit. The report shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Elections Oversight Committee
and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government within 10 business days of the date the audit is completed.

History.
2019-239, s. 6(a).

§ 163-182.13.
New elections.

When State Board May Order New Election. — The State Board of Elections may order a new election, upon agreement of at least four of its members, in the case of any one or more of the following:

Ineligible voters sufficient in number to change the outcome of the election were allowed to vote in the election, and it is not possible from examination of the official ballots to determine how those ineligible voters voted and to correct the totals.

Eligible voters sufficient in number to change the outcome of the election were improperly prevented from voting.

Other irregularities affected a sufficient number of votes to change the outcome of the election.

Irregularities or improprieties occurred to such an extent that they taint the results of the entire election and cast doubt on its fairness.

State Board to Set Procedures. — The State Board of Elections shall determine when a new election shall be held and shall set the schedule for publication of the notice, preparation of absentee official ballots, and the other actions necessary to conduct
the election.

Eligibility to Vote in New Election. — Eligibility to vote in the new election shall be determined by the voter’s eligibility at the time of the new election, except that in a primary, no person who voted in the initial primary of one party shall vote
in the new election in the primary of another party. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules to effect the provisions of this subsection.

Jurisdiction in Which New Election Held. — The new election shall be held in the entire jurisdiction in which the original election was held.

Which Candidates to Be on Official Ballot. — All the candidates who were listed on the official ballot in the original election shall be listed in the same order on the official ballot for the new election, except in either of the following:

If a candidate dies or otherwise becomes ineligible between the time of the original election and the new election, that candidate may be replaced in the same manner as if the vacancy occurred before the original election.

If the election is for a multiseat office, and the irregularities could not have affected the election of one or more of the candidates, the new election, upon agreement of at least four members of the State Board, may be held among only those candidates
whose election could have been affected by the irregularities.

Tie Votes. — If ineligible voters voted in an election and it is possible to determine from the official ballots the way in which those votes were cast and to correct the results, and consequently the election ends in a tie, the provisions of

G.S. 163-182.8

concerning tie votes shall apply.

Primary Required for a New Election. — For any new congressional general election ordered under subsection (a) of this section, a primary for that election shall be conducted. The State Board shall determine when the primary shall be held, and shall
set the schedule for publication of the notice, preparation of absentee official ballots, and the other actions necessary to conduct the primary.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2003-278, s. 8(a); 2008-150, s. 2(a); 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 5(j); 2017-6, ss. 2, 3, 7(j); 2018-146, ss. 1, 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.13A.
Contested elections for Council of State offices.

Application of Procedures. — A contested election for any elective office established by Article III of the Constitution shall be determined by joint ballot of both houses of the General Assembly under Article VI, Section 5 of the Constitution in accordance
with the provisions of this section. Except as provided by this section, the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 120 shall apply to contested elections under this section and shall govern standing, notice of intent to contest, answers,
service of process, evidence, the petition, procedures, grounds, and relief except as provided in this section. All filings shall be with the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives.

Notice of Intent. — Notice of the intent to contest the election under this section shall be filed with the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives as if it were a contested election for the House of Representatives as prescribed in Article 3
of Chapter 120.

Jurisdiction. — When a contest arises out of the general election, the General Assembly elected at the same time shall hear and decide it. Any other contest shall be heard by the General Assembly sitting at the time of the election.

Committee. — A contest filed under this section shall initially be heard before a select committee consisting of five Senators appointed by the President Pro Tempore and five Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Not
more than three members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore shall be members of the same political party. Not more than three members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker shall be members of
the same political party. That committee shall have the same power as a committee under Article 3 of Chapter 120 and may adopt supplemental rules as necessary to govern its proceedings. The committee shall report its findings as
to the law and the facts and make recommendations to the General Assembly for its action.

Final Determination. — The final determination on the recommendations of the committee shall be made by the General Assembly, both houses sitting in joint session in the Hall of the House of Representatives, with the Speaker of the House of Representatives
presiding. The vote shall be taken as provided by Article VI, Section 5 of the Constitution. In order to find for the contestant or contestee and order the contestant or contestee elected, the vote on the joint ballot must include
the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the General Assembly voting on the issue. The ballots shall be in writing and are subject to the provisions of G.S. 143-318.13(b).

Basis for Decision. —

If the contest is as to the eligibility or qualifications of the contestee, the General Assembly shall determine if the contestee is eligible and qualified. If it determines that the contestee is not eligible or not qualified, it shall order a new election.

If the contest is as to the conduct or results of the election, the General Assembly shall determine which candidate received the highest number of votes. If it can determine which candidate received the highest number of votes, it shall declare that
candidate to be elected. If it cannot determine which candidate received the highest number of votes, it may order a new election, or may order such other relief as may be necessary and proper. If it determines that two
or more candidates shall be equal and highest in votes, the provisions of

G.S. 147-4

shall apply.

Final Determination. — A copy of the final determination of the General Assembly under this section shall be filed with the Secretary of State and with the State Board of Elections.

Copies. — The Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives shall make copies of any filings and transmit them to the Principal Clerk for the Senate.

Applicability. — This section applies only to a general or special election and does not apply to the primary or any other part of the nominating process.

Judicial Proceedings Abated. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the initiation of a contest under this Article, any judicial proceedings involving either the contestant or the contestee encompassing the issues set forth in the notice
of intent or an answer thereto concerning the election that is the subject of the contest shall abate. The clerk shall file a copy of the notice of intent and final determination with the court in any judicial proceeding pending
prior to the filing of the notice of intent.

General Assembly Determination Not Reviewable. — The decision of the General Assembly in determining the contest of the election pursuant to this section may not be reviewed by the General Court of Justice.

Definition. — As used in this section, “contest” means a challenge to the apparent election for any elective office established by Article III of the Constitution or to request the decision of an undecided election to any elective office established
by Article III of the Constitution, where the challenge or the request is filed in accordance with the timing and procedures of this section.

History.
2005-3, s. 3(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.14.
Appeal of a final decision to superior court; appeal to the General Assembly or a house thereof.

Final Decision. — A copy of the final decision of the State Board of Elections on an election protest shall be served on the parties personally or through delivery by U.S. mail or a designated delivery service authorized under 26 U.S.C. § 7502(f)(2)
if that delivery provides a record of the date and time of delivery to the address provided by the party. A decision to order a new election is considered a final decision for purposes of seeking review of the decision.

Timing of Right of Appeal. — Except in the case of a general or special election to either house of the General Assembly or to an office established by Article III of the Constitution, an aggrieved party has the right to appeal the final decision to
the Superior Court of Wake County within 10 days of the date of service.After the decision by the State Board of Elections has been served on the parties, the certification of nomination or election or the results of the referendum
shall issue pursuant to

G.S. 163-182.15

unless an appealing party obtains a stay of the certification from the Superior Court of Wake County within 10 days after the date of service. The court shall not issue a stay of certification unless the petitioner
shows the court that the petitioner has appealed the decision of the State Board of Elections, that the petitioner is an aggrieved party, and that the petitioner is likely to prevail in the appeal.If service is by mail or a designated
delivery service, the additional time after service provided in Rule 6(e) of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to both the time for appeal and the time to obtain a stay under this subsection.

Contests for General Assembly and Executive Branch Offices. — In the case of a general or special election to either house of the General Assembly or to an office established by Article III of the Constitution, an unsuccessful candidate has the right
to appeal the final decision to the General Assembly in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 120 and

G.S. 163-182.13

A, as appropriate.After the decision by the State Board of Elections has been served on the parties, the certification of nomination or election shall issue pursuant to

G.S. 163-182.15

unless a contest of the election is initiated pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 120 or

G.S. 163-182.13

A, as appropriate.

Attorney’s fees shall not be awarded against the State Board of Elections in any election protest brought under this Article.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2003-278, s. 8(b); 2005-3, s. 4; 2008-150, s. 4(a); 2009-541, s. 27; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.15.
Certificate of nomination or election, or certificate of the results of a referendum.

Issued by County Board of Elections. — In ballot items within the jurisdiction of the county board of elections, the county board shall issue a certificate of nomination or election, or a certificate of the results of the referendum, as appropriate.
The certificate shall be issued by the county board six days after the completion of the canvass pursuant to

G.S. 163-182.5

, unless there is an election protest pending. If there is an election protest, the certificate of nomination or election or the certificate of the result of the referendum shall be issued in one of the following
ways, as appropriate:

The certificate shall be issued five days after the protest is dismissed or denied by the county board of elections, unless that decision has been appealed to the State Board of Elections.

The certificate shall be issued on the tenth day after the final decision of the State Board, unless the State Board has ordered a new election or the issuance of the certificate is stayed by the Superior Court of Wake County pursuant to

G.S. 163-182.14

.

If the decision of the State Board has been appealed to the Superior Court of Wake County and the court has stayed the certification, the certificate shall be issued five days after the entry of a final order in the case in the Superior Court of Wake
County, unless that court or an appellate court orders otherwise.

No certificate of election need be issued for any member of the General Assembly following a contest of the election pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 120.

Issued by State Board of Elections. — In ballot items within the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections, the State Board of Elections shall issue a certificate of nomination or election, or a certificate of the results of the referendum, as appropriate.
The certificate shall be issued by the State Board six days after the completion of the canvass pursuant to

G.S. 163-182.5

, unless there is an election protest pending. If there is an election protest, the certificate of nomination or election or the certificate of the result of the referendum shall be issued in one of the following
ways, as appropriate:

The certificate shall be issued 10 days after the final decision of the State Board on the election protest, unless the State Board has ordered a new election or the issuance of the certificate is stayed by the Superior Court of Wake County pursuant to

G.S. 163-182.14

.

If the decision of the State Board has been appealed to the Superior Court of Wake County and the court has stayed the certification, the certificate shall be issued five days after the entry of a final order in the case in the Superior Court of Wake
County, unless that court or an appellate court orders otherwise.

The certificate shall be issued immediately upon the filing of a copy of the determination of the General Assembly with the State Board of Elections in contested elections involving any elective office established by Article III of the Constitution.

No certificate of election need be issued for any member of the General Assembly following a contest of the election pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 120.

Copy to Secretary of State. — The State Board of Elections shall provide to the Secretary of State a copy of each certificate of nomination or election, or certificate of the results of a referendum, issued by it. The Secretary shall keep the certificates
in a form readily accessible and useful to the public.

Determining Results. — In a primary for party nomination, the results shall be determined in accordance with

G.S. 163-111

. In a general election, the individuals having the highest number of votes for each office shall be declared elected to the office, and the certificate shall be issued accordingly. In a referendum, the ballot proposal
receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared to have prevailed, and the certificate shall be issued accordingly.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2003-278, s. 10(k); 2005-3, s. 5; 2005-428, s. 13; 2007-391, s. 11; 2007-484, s. 22; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.16.
Governor to issue commissions for certain offices.

The Secretary of State shall send a notice to the Governor that a certificate of election has been issued for any of the following offices, and upon receiving the notice, the Governor shall provide to each such elected official a commission attesting
to that person’s election or retention:

Members of the United States House of Representatives.

Justices, judges, and district attorneys of the General Court of Justice.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2015-66, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.17.
Summary of officials’ duties under this Article.

This Section a Summary. — The provisions of this section provide a nonexclusive summary of the duties given to officials under this Article. The legal duty is contained, not in this section, but in the other sections of this Article.

Duties of the Precinct Officials. — Precinct officials, in accordance with rules of the State Board of Elections and under the supervision of the county board of elections, shall perform all of the following:

Count votes when votes are required to be counted at the voting place.

G.S. 163-182.2

.

Make an unofficial report of returns to the county board of elections.

G.S. 163-182.2

.

Certify the integrity of the vote and the security of the official ballots at the voting place. G.S. 163-182.2.

Return official ballots and equipment to the county board of elections. G.S. 163-182.2.

Duties of the County Board of Elections. — The county board of elections, in accordance with rules of the State Board of Elections, shall perform all of the following:

Count absentee and provisional official ballots and other official ballots required to be initially counted by the county board of elections.

G.S. 163-182.2

.

Canvass results in all ballot items on the official ballot in the county.

G.S. 163-182.5

.

Order a recount in any ballot item on the official ballot in the county, where necessary to complete the canvass, and where not prohibited from doing so.

G.S. 163-182.7

.

Conduct any recount that has been ordered by the county board of elections or the State Board of Elections or that has been properly demanded in accordance with

G.S. 163-182.7

(b).

Conduct hearings in election protests as provided in

G.S. 163-182.10

.

Prepare abstracts of returns in all the ballot items in the county.

G.S. 163-182.6

.

Retain one original abstract and distribute the other two originals as follows:

One to the clerk of superior court in the county.

One to the State Board of Elections.

G.S. 163-182.6

.

Issue a certificate of nomination or election or a certificate of the results of a referendum in each ballot item within the jurisdiction of the county board of elections. Provide a copy of the certificate to the clerk of court.

G.S. 163-182.15

.

Duties of the State Board of Elections. — The State Board of Elections shall perform all the following:

Promulgate rules as directed in this Article.

G.S. 163-182.1

, 163-182.2, 163-182.7, 163-182.10, and 163-182.13.

Provide supervisory direction to the county boards of elections as provided in this Article.

G.S. 163-182.1

and

G.S. 163-182.2

.

Canvass the results in ballot items within the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections.

G.S. 163-182.5

.

Order and supervise a recount in any ballot item within the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections, where necessary to complete the canvass.

G.S. 163-182.7

.

Hear and decide appeals from decisions of county boards of elections in election protests.

G.S. 163-182.11

.

Order new elections in accordance with

G.S. 163-182.15

.

Prepare, in duplicate originals, composite abstracts of ballot items within the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections.

G.S. 163-182.6

.

Retain one original of the composite abstract and deliver to the Secretary of State the other original composite abstract of the results of ballot items within the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections.

G.S. 163-182.6

.

Certify the results of any election within the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections and provide a copy to the Secretary of State.

G.S. 163-182.15

.

Duties of the Secretary of State. — The Secretary of State shall retain and compile in a useful form all the abstracts and returns provided by the county boards of elections and the State Board of Elections.

G.S. 163-182.6

.

Duty of the Governor. — The Governor shall issue a commission to any person elected to an office listed in

G.S. 163-182.16

upon notification from the Secretary of State that a certificate of election has been issued to the person.

G.S. 163-182.16

.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-183 through 163-186.

Reserved for future codification purposes.